Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-386
Occupation tax; levy; due date.

Counties may levy an annual occupation tax against any person, firm, or corporation now maintaining and operating any community antenna television service within its boundaries; and may levy an annual occupation tax against any persons, firms, or corporations hereafter constructing, installing, operating, or maintaining such community antenna television service. Any such occupation tax so levied shall be due and payable on May 1 of each year to the treasurer of such county.

Laws 1971, LB 257, § 4.